Illinois, session 104th, HB4968.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Public Aid Code is amended by 5adding Section 5-50a as follows: 6    (305 ILCS 5/5-50a new)7    Sec. 5-50a. Telehealth delivery of intensive outpatient 8services.9    (a) Purpose. To ensure access to medically necessary 10behavioral health treatment, the medical assistance program 11shall authorize intensive outpatient services to be provided 12via telehealth in a manner consistent with existing telehealth 13coverage under this Code.14    (b) Definitions. As used in this Section:15    "Intensive outpatient services" means a structured 16behavioral health treatment service, delivered at a minimum 3 17times per week for 9 hours or more, that is more intensive than 18standard outpatient services and less intensive than partial 19hospitalization, delivered pursuant to an individualized 20treatment plan and consistent with Department-established 21criteria and generally accepted standards of care.22    "Telehealth" has the meaning given to the term "telehealth 23services" in Section 5 of the Telehealth Act.  HB4968- 2 -LRB104 19589 KTG 33037 b1    "Telehealth" includes the delivery of health care services 2using interactive telecommunications systems, including 3synchronous audio and video, that allow real-time 4communication between a patient and a provider.5    (c) Coverage. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, 6the Department shall provide coverage under the medical 7assistance program for intensive outpatient services delivered 8via telehealth when the services:9        (1) are otherwise covered when provided in person;10        (2) are medically necessary;11        (3) are delivered by a provider enrolled in the 12    medical assistance program and acting within the scope of 13    the provider's license, certification, or authorization 14    under State law; and15        (4) comply with all applicable federal and State 16    telehealth requirements.17    (d) Parity. Intensive outpatient services provided via 18telehealth service under this Section shall be subject to the 19same coverage requirements, utilization management, and 20reimbursement methodologies as intensive outpatient services 21provided in person, in accordance with Section 5-5.25 and 22Department rules.23    (e) Standards and safeguards. Telehealth delivery of 24intensive outpatient services shall:25        (1) meet the same standards of care as in-person 26    services;  HB4968- 3 -LRB104 19589 KTG 33037 b1        (2) include informed consent for the use of 2    telehealth, as required by Department rule;3        (3) ensure compliance with State and federal privacy 4    and confidentiality laws;5        (4) include protocols for emergency response, 6    continuity of care, and referral to in-person services 7    when clinically appropriate; and8        (5) not require any in-person elements or services.9    (f) Rulemaking authority. The Department may adopt rules 10consistent with Section 5-5.25 that are necessary to implement 11this Section, including rules governing clinical eligibility, 12documentation, quality assurance, and program integrity.13    (g) Federal approval. Implementation of this Section is 14subject to any required federal approval. 15    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 16becoming law.